test/tools/fsmbook-examples/FinnishOTProsody/FinnishOTProsody.xfst.script
# -*- coding: utf-8 -*-

# finnish-ot-prosody.script

# Copyright (C) 2004  Lauri Karttunen
#
# This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation; either version 2 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.
#   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#   GNU General Public License for more details.

# This script maps Finnish words into a prosodic representation
# that splits the words into syllables, adds primary and secondary
# stress marks, and organizes the syllables into feet. For example,
# the input "ilmoittautumisesta" 'registering' (Sg. Elative) becomes
#
#     (íl.moit).(tàu.tu).mi.(sès.ta)
#
# where the acute accent on the first vowel indicates primary stress,
# the grave accents mark secondary stress and feet are enclosed in
# parentheses.

# Note that this script is encoded in utf-8. To run it,
# you should start fst in utf-8 mode:
#
#     xfst -utf8 -l finnish-ot-prosody.fst

# The version of xfst that comes with the Book is not utf8-enabled
# To check about the availability of a utf8-enabled version of xfst,
# please write to karttunen@parc.com.

# The analysis that the script implements comes from Paul Kiparsky's paper
# "Finnish Noun Inflection" in Generative Approaches to Finnic and
# Saami Linguistics, Diane Nelson and Satu Manninen (eds.), pp.109-161,
# CSLI Publications, 2003. It covers only the basic system presented
# on pages 111-112 of the paper and does not cover the extensions
# in the latter part of the paper.

# The system encoded in the script consists of a Gen function
# that produces a vast number of output candidates for each input
# word. The candidates are subject to nine ranked optimality
# constraints: Clash, AlignLeft, MainStress, FootBin, Lapse, NonFinal,
# StressToWeight, Parse, and AllFeetFirst.

# Lenient composition is used to guarantee that at least one output
# form survives, no matter how suboptimal it is.

# Lenient composition is an operation, .O. (capital O), is part of the xfst
# language but it is not described in the Beesley & Karttunen book. To
# learn about lenient composition, please consult Karttunen's paper on
# "The Proper Treatment of Optimality in Phonology".

# You may find it interesting to compare this OT implementation of
# Kiparsky's analysis with a non-OT account for the same data.
# See the Finnish Non-OT Prosody script.

################################## DATA ##################################

define FinnWords {kalastelet} | {kalasteleminen} | {ilmoittautuminen} |
                 {järjestelmättömyydestänsä} | {kalastelemme} |
                 {ilmoittautumisesta} | {järjestelmällisyydelläni} |
                 {järjestelmällistämätöntä} | {voimisteluttelemasta} |
                 {opiskelija} | {opettamassa} | {kalastelet} |
                 {strukturalismi} | {onnittelemanikin} | {mäki} |
                 {perijä} | {repeämä} | {ergonomia} | {puhelimellani} |
                 {matematiikka} | {puhelimistani} | {rakastajattariansa} |
                 {kuningas} | {kainostelijat} | {ravintolat} |
                 {merkonomin} ;

######################### BASIC DEFINITIONS #############################

define HighV [u | y | i];                          # High vowel
define MidV  [e | o | ö];                          # Mid vowel
define LowV  [a | ä] ;                             # Low vowel
define USV [HighV | MidV | LowV];                  # Unstressed Vowel

define C [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m |
          n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z];  # Consonant

define MSV [á | é | í | ó | ú | ý | "ä´" | "ö´"];
define SSV [à | è | ì | ò | ù | "y`" | "ä`" | "ö`"];
define SV [MSV | SSV];                             # Stressed vowel
define V [USV | SV] ;                              # Vowel

define P [V | C];                                  # Phone
define B [[\P+] | .#.];                            # Boundary

define E .#. | ".";                                # Edge
define SB [~$"." "." ~$"."];                       # At most one syllable boundary

define Light [C* V];                               # Light syllable
define Heavy [Light P+];                           # Heavy syllable

define S [Heavy | Light];                          # Syllable
define SS [S & $SV];                               # Stressed syllable
define US [S & ~$SV];                              # Unstressed syllable
define MSS [S & $MSV] ;                            # Syllable with main stress
define BF [S "." S];                               # Binary foot


################################### GEN ##################################

# A diphthong is a combination of two unlike vowels that together form
# the nucleus of a syllable. In general, Finnish diphthongs end in a high vowel.
# However, there are three exceptional high-mid diphthongs: ie, uo, and yö
# that historically come from long ee, oo, and öö, respectively.
# All other adjacent vowels must be separated by a syllable boundary.

define MarkNonDiphthongs [ [. .] -> "." || [HighV | MidV] _ LowV, # i.a, e.a
                                           i _ [MidV - e],        # i.o, i.ö
                                           u _ [MidV - o],        # u.e
                                           y _ [MidV - ö] ];      # y.e

# The general syllabification rule has exceptions. In particular, loan
# words such as ate.isti 'atheist' must be partially syllabified in the
# lexicon.

define Syllabify C* V+ C* @-> ... "." || _ C V ;

# Optionally adds primary or secondary stress to the first vowel
# of each syllable.

define Stress a (->) á|à, e (->) é|è, i (->) í|ì, o (->) ó|ò,
              u (->) ú|ù, y (->) ý|"y`", ä (->) "ä´"|"ä`", ö (->) "ö´"|"ö`"
              || E C* _ ;

# Scan the word, optionally dividing it to any combination of
# unary, binary, and ternary feet. Each foot must contain at least
# one stressed syllable.

define Scan [[S ("." S ("." S)) & $SS] (->) "(" ... ")" || E _ E] ;

# In keeping with the idea of "richness of the base", the Gen
# function produces a great number of output candidates for
# even short words. Long words have millions of possible outputs.

define Gen [MarkNonDiphthongs .o. Syllabify .o. Stress .o. Scan];

######################### OT CONSTRAINTS #############################

# We use asterisks to mark constraint violations. Ordinary constraints
# such as Lapse assign single asterisks as the violation marks and the
# candidate with the fewest number is selected. Gradient constraints
# such as AllFeetFirst mark violations with sequences of asterisks.
# The number increases with distance from the word edge.

# Every instance of * in an output candidate is a violation.

define Viol ${*};

# We prune candidates with "lenient composition" that eliminates
# candidates that violate the constraint provided that at least
# one output candidate survives.

define Viol0 ~Viol;        # No violations
define Viol1 ~[Viol^2];    # At most one violation
define Viol2 ~[Viol^3];    # At most two violations
define Viol3 ~[Viol^4];    # etc.
define Viol4 ~[Viol^5];
define Viol5 ~[Viol^6];
define Viol6 ~[Viol^7];
define Viol7 ~[Viol^8];
define Viol8 ~[Viol^9];
define Viol9 ~[Viol^10];
define Viol10 ~[Viol^11];
define Viol11 ~[Viol^12];
define Viol12 ~[Viol^13];
define Viol13 ~[Viol^14];
define Viol14 ~[Viol^15];
define Viol15 ~[Viol^16];

# This eliminates the violation marks after the candidate set has
# been pruned by a constraint.

define Pardon {*} -> 0;

########################## CONSTRAINTS ##############################

# In this section we define nine constraints for Finnish prosody,
# listed in the order of their ranking: MainStress, Clash, AlignLeft,
# FootBin, Lapse, NonFinal, StressToWeight, Parse, and AllFeetFirst.
# For the one inviolable constraint, we assign no violation marks.
# Clash, Align-Left and Foot-Bin are always satisfiable in Finnish
# but we assign violation marks as not to depend on that knowledge.

# Main Stress: The primary stress in Finnish is on the first
#              syllable. This is an inviolable constraint.

define MainStress [B MSS ~$MSS];


# Clash: No stress on adjacent syllables.

define Clash SS -> ... {*} || SS B _ ;


# Align-Left: The stressed syllable is initial in the foot.

define AlignLeft SV -> ... {*} || .#. ~[?* "(" C*] _ ;


# Foot-Bin: Feet are minimally bimoraic and maximally bisyllabic.

define FootBin ["(" Light ")" | "(" S ["." S]^>1] -> ... {*} ;


# Lapse: Every unstressed syllable must be adjacent to a stressed
# syllable.

define Lapse US -> ... {*} || [B US B] _ [B US B];


# Non-Final: The final syllable is not stressed.

define NonFinal SS -> ... {*} || _ ~$S .#.;


# Stress-To-Weight: Stressed syllables are heavy.

define StressToWeight [SS & Light] -> ... {*} || _ ")"| E;


# License-?: Syllables are parsed into feet.

    define Parse S -> ... {*} || E _ E;


# All-Ft-Left: Every foot starts at the beginning of a
#              prosodic word.

define AllFeetFirst [ "(" -> ...   {*} || .#. SB _
                                      .o.
                  "(" -> ... {*}^2 || .#. SB^2 _
                                      .o.
                  "(" -> ... {*}^3 || .#. SB^3 _
                                      .o.
                  "(" -> ... {*}^4 || .#. SB^4 _
                                      .o.
                  "(" -> ... {*}^5 || .#. SB^5 _
                                      .o.
                  "(" -> ... {*}^6 || .#. SB^6 _
                                      .o.
                  "(" -> ... {*}^7 || .#. SB^7 _
                                      .o.
                 "(" -> ... {*}^8 || .#. SB^8 _ ];

########################## Evaluation ######################################

echo ### Computing the prosody for FinnWords

# Some constraints can always be satisfied; some constraints are
# violated many times. The limits have been chosen to produce
# a unique winner in all the 25 test cases in FinnWords.

regex [FinnWords .o. Gen
       .o. MainStress
       .o. Clash .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
       .o. AlignLeft .O. Viol0
       .o. FootBin .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
       .o. Lapse .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
       .o. NonFinal .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
       .o. StressToWeight .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
       .o. Parse .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O. Viol0 .o. Pardon
       .o. AllFeetFirst .O. Viol15 .O. Viol14 .O. Viol13
           Viol12 .O. Viol11 .O. Viol10 .O. Viol9 .O. Viol8 .O. Viol7 .O.
           Viol6  .O. Viol5  .O. Viol4  .O. Viol3 .O. Viol2 .O. Viol1 .O.
           Viol0 .o. Pardon
      ];

#write att FinnishOTProsody FOO BAR
save stack FinnishOTProsody.foma.gz

# print lower-words

# This final command produces the following output. The two errors
# indicate that there is a problem in Kiparsky's analysis.

# (ón.nit).(tè.le).(mà.ni).kin
# (ó.pis).(kè.li).ja
# (ó.pet).ta.(màs.sa)
# (íl.moit).(tàu.tu).mi.(sès.ta)
# (íl.moit).(tàu.tu).(mì.nen)
# (ér.go).(nò.mi).a
# (vói.mis).te.(lùt.te).le.(màs.ta)
# (strúk.tu).ra.(lìs.mi)
# (ré.pe).(ä`.mä)
# (rá.vin).(tò.lat)
# (rá.kas).ta.(jàt.ta).ri.(àn.sa)
# (pú.he).li.(mìs.ta).ni
# (pú.he).li.(mèl.la).ni
# (pé.ri).jä
# (mä´.ki)
# (mér.ko).(nò.min)
# (má.te).ma.(tìik.ka)
# (kú.nin).gas
# (kái.nos).(tè.li).jat
# (ká.las).te.(lèm.me) 
# (ká.las).te.(lè.mi).nen  <==== Error
# (ká.las).(tè.let)
# (jä´r.jes).tel.(mä`l.li).syy.(dèl.lä).ni  <===== Error
# (jä´r.jes).(tèl.mät).tö.(my`y.des).(tä`n.sä)
# (jä´r.jes).(tèl.mäl).(lìs.tä).mä.(tö`n.tä)
        
